Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3218.7-2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, no tuition
or fees shall be charged to any person who has been honorably
discharged from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of
the United States or Oklahoma National Guard and who has been
certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or
its successor, to have a one-hundred-percent (100%) permanent
disability sustained through military action or accident or
resulting from disease contracted while in such active service.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 15016 Page 1

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15016 AQH 12/29/25


















Req. No. 15016 Page 2